Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.090

Warrants of political subdivisions.

All warrants for the payment of claims against diking, ditch, drainage and irrigation districts and school districts of the second class, who do not issue their own warrants, as well as political subdivisions within the county for which no other provision is made by law, shall be drawn and issued by the county auditor of the county wherein such subdivision is located, upon proper approval by the governing body thereof.

[ 2009 c 337 s 4; 1975 c 43 s 31; 1973 c 111 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.090. Prior: 1915 c 74 s 1; RRS s 4096.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Severability—1973 c 111: See note following RCW 28A.330.230.